Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-301 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Defined
Contribution Retirement Plan for Teachers Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-302 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A trust shall be created for the investment of the Defined
Contribution Retirement Plan for Teachers' plan assets. The trust
shall be held, invested, and administered by the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma (System), with the System acting as
Req. No. 14108 Page 2

RBH No. 14108
trus tee and fiduciary, in accordance with the terms of the plan
under this act and applicable law, solely in the interest of plan
participants and their beneficiaries and for the exclusive purpose
of providing benefits to participants and their beneficiaries and
defraying reasonable expenses of administering the plan.
B. Certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of this
title, who first become employed in a full-time-equivalent position
or a position which is less than full time but more than a half-time
position and which qualifies for employee benefits, including, but
not limited to, health insurance and leave time by any participating
employer of the System, as defined by paragraph 5 of Section 17-101
of this title, on or after November 1, 2026, shall have the
opportunity to participate in the defined contribution plan created
pursuant to this act.
C. The employee may make a one-time irrevocable election prior
to the first day of the month following employment that shall be in
writing and shall cover all future service with a participating
employer, regardless of a break in service, to participate in the
Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma, as established pursuant to
Section 17-101 et seq. of this title.
D. An employee described in subsection B of this section shall
become a participant in the defined contribution plan and the
employee shall not accrue any service credit in the Teachers'

Req. No. 14108 Page 3

RBH No. 14108
Reti rement System of Oklahoma, as established pursuant to Section
17-101 et seq. of this title.
E. Employees who participate in the defined contribution plan
shall be deemed to begin service in the defined contribution plan on
the first day of the month following employment.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-303 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Beneficiary" means the recipient designated by the
participant to receive the plan benefits payable upon the death of
the participant;
2. "Board" means the Board of Trustees of the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma;
3. "Code" means the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended;
4. "Compensation" means salary plus fringe benefits, excluding
the flexible benefit allowance pursuant to Section 26-105 of this
title;
5. "Defined contribution retirement plan" means the Defined
Contribution Retirement Plan for Teachers established pursuant to
this act;
6. "Employee" means any teacher, principal, superintendent,
supervisor, administrator, librarian, certified or registered nurse,
Req. No. 14108 Page 4

RBH No. 14108
coll ege professor, or college president whose salary is paid wholly
or in part from public funds. An employee of any state department,
board, board of regents, or board of trustees who is in a
supervisory or administrative position, the function of which is
primarily devoted to public education, shall be considered
classified personnel under the meaning of Section 17-101 et seq. of
this title, at the discretion of the Board of Trustees of the
Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma. The term "teacher" shall
also include instructors and counselors employed by the Department
of Corrections and holding valid teaching certificates issued by the
State Department of Education. Provided, that a person employed by
the Department of Corrections as an instructor or counselor shall
have been actively engaged in the teaching profession for a period
not less than three (3) years prior to employment to be eligible to
participate in the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma. The
Department of Corrections shall contribute the employer's share to
the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma;
7. "Employer" means the state and any of its designated agents
or agencies with responsibility and authority for public education,
such as boards of education of elementary and independent school
districts, boards of regents, boards of control, or any other agency
of and within the state by which a person may be employed for
service in public education. Employer shall also mean the board of
directors of a tuition-free, nonprofit alternative school of choice
Req. No. 14108 Page 5

RBH No. 14108
that provides education, therapeutic counseling, and outreach
programs, and which is aligned with a school district which receives
grant funds from governmental sources;
8. "Individual account" means an account that is established
for each participant to record the deposit of participant
contributions, employer contributions, and interest, dividends, or
other accumulations credited on behalf of the participant; and
9. "Participant" means any teacher or other employee
participating in the plan pursuant to Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-304 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Board of Trustees of the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma shall take whatever action is reasonable and necessary to
have the defined contribution plan authorized by this act to be
recognized as a tax-qualified plan as that term is defined by 26
U.S.C., Section 401 et seq., or any other applicable provisions of
federal law. The Board is also authorized to establish a plan or
use an existing plan established under 26 U.S.C., Section 457(b) if
it is necessary to carry out the intent of this act. The Board
shall take whatever action is reasonable and necessary to obtain
confirmation from the Internal Revenue Service that any such 457(b)
plan is consistent with the requirements of Section 457(b).

Req. No. 14108 Page 6

RBH No. 14108
B. The Board shall provide participants with individualized
ongoing investment and retirement income planning services,
including education and plan-based tools and independent investment
advice, to help set, measure, and adjust personal retirement income
and savings goals as appropriate during their working years to help
the participant meet their financial objectives in retirement and
changing circumstances.
C. The Board shall create an operating plan document consistent
with this act and may adopt any additional provision to the plan
necessary and appropriate for its operation and purpose. The Board
may submit to the Internal Revenue Service a request for a
determination letter or other rulings that state the plan and its
features are qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code.
D The Board shall:
1. Enter into a contract with a company or companies to provide
and administer retirement plan investments, retirement lifetime
income products and in-plan annuity products, plan administrative
services, and participant-level education;
2. Provide appropriate long-term retirement-oriented investment
that can satisfy two distinct goals: management of future
retirement income risk, including investment risk and longevity
risk, and portfolios that strive to reduce volatility of participant
account balances as participants grow closer to retirement;

Req. No. 14108 Page 7

RBH No. 14108
3. Take into account all of the following factors when
considering a company or companies with which to contract:
a. the financial stability of the company and the ability
of the company to provide the contracted rights and
benefits to the participants,
b. the cost of the investments offered, plan
administration, and services to the participants,
c. the quality of the investment design or designs
provided to achieve the specified replacement income
using targeted retirement income principles,
d. the experience of the company and its ability to
record keep and administer retirement-income-focused
plans like the plan created under this act,
e. the experience of the company in providing lifetime
retirement income to plan participants, and
f. the experience of the company in providing plan
education, retirement planning, counseling, and
independent advice to plan participants with varying
sources and levels of retirement income;
4. Require under the contract that the provider provide
education, retirement savings planning, counseling, and objective
participant-specific plan investment advice to participants; and
5. Provide participants with a menu of in-plan immediate or
deferred lifetime annuity options, either fixed or variable or a
Req. No. 14108 Page 8

RBH No. 14108
comb ination of both. Annuity options may include both nominal and
inflation-protected options. Qualified longevity annuity contracts
under the Code shall be provided to allow participants another
option for managing longevity risk.
E. The Board may:
1. Employ other services it deems necessary, including legal
services, for the operation and administration of the defined
contribution retirement plan; and
2. Perform all acts, whether or not expressly authorized, that
it deems necessary and proper for the operation and protection of
the plan.
F. The Board shall adopt policies regarding the defined
contribution retirement plan, including the administration of the
participant and employer contributions, investment options,
termination of participation in the defined contribution retirement
plan, administration of the payout options under the defined
contribution retirement plan, and administration of the participant
distributions.
G. The Board shall participate in a competitive bid process at
least once every five (5) years to contract with a private person or
any qualified company or companies to administer the defined
contribution retirement plan established pursuant to this act.
H. Any contract for a third party administrator of the defined
contribution retirement plan shall include competitive fees and
Req. No. 14108 Page 9

RBH No. 14108
prov isions requiring quarterly meetings with the System, annual
updates to the Board on the status of the defined contribution
retirement plan, and quarterly statements to each participant.
I. On or before July 1 of each year, the Board shall report the
status of the defined contribution plan to the Governor, the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, and the Speaker
of the Oklahoma House of Representatives. The report shall include
a summary of demographic data and cumulative account balances for
participants in the plan, as well as summary statements as to the
progress of the participants for achieving the plan's retirement
income replacement objectives.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-305 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each participant in the Defined Contribution Retirement Plan
for Teachers shall contribute four and five-tenths percent (4.5%) of
the participant's compensation by salary reduction which shall be
deposited in the participant's individual account.
B. A participant may make a one-time irrevocable election,
before the participant is eligible to participate in any qualified
plan of the employer, to contribute seven percent (7.0%) of the
participant's compensation, which shall be the participant's
contribution rate for the remainder of the participant's employment
with any employer participating in the plan.
Req. No. 14108 Page 10

RBH No. 14108
C. Although designated as employee contributions, all
participant contributions made to the plan shall be paid by the
employer as permitted under Section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended. The contributions picked up by an
employer may be made through either a reduction in the participant's
compensation or an offset against future salary increases. A
participant in the plan may not choose to receive the contributed
amounts directly instead of the employer paying the amounts to the
plan. All participant contributions that are paid by the employer
as provided in this subsection shall be treated as employer
contributions under Section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, shall be excluded from the participant's gross
income for federal and state income tax purposes, and are includable
in the gross income of the participant or the participant's
beneficiaries only in the taxable year in which they are
distributed.
D. Each employer shall annually contribute an amount equal to
six percent (6.0%) of each participant's compensation. If an
employee selects a contribution rate of seven percent (7.0%) or
more, but not higher than allowed pursuant to the maximum annual
contribution limit prescribed by Section 415 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, the employer matching amount shall be
seven percent (7.0%).

Req. No. 14108 Page 11

RBH No. 14108
E. The employer share of the amount paid in subsection D of
this section shall be paid on each date that a participant
contribution is made and shall be credited to the participant's
individual account.
F. A participant may not take loans on any portion of the
accumulated assets in the participant's individual account.
G. The employer match as set forth in subsection D of this
section may be increased at any time by the Legislature without
affecting the then-existing rights of participating employees and
beneficiaries in order to encourage participating employees to
accumulate deferred income reserves for themselves and their
dependents. The employer match may be decreased at any time by the
Legislature without affecting the then-existing rights of
participating employees and beneficiaries in order to provide
funding as may be needed to reduce the unfunded liabilities of the
defined benefit plan as set forth in Section 17-101 et seq. of this
title, but shall not be less than six percent (6.0%) for any year
during which the defined contribution plan is maintained.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-306 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A. participant's contributions and earnings on those
contributions are immediately vested and nonforfeitable. A
participant is fully vested in the employer contributions and
Req. No. 14108 Page 12

RBH No. 14108
rela ted earnings in the plan after three (3) years of participating
employment or reaching sixty-five (65) years of age.
B. The plan will disregard all periods of participation and
service of a non-vested participant who leaves eligible employment
and takes a total distribution of the participant's account. If the
former participant returns to eligible employment, the participant
will be treated as a new employee under the plan.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-307 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A participant shall direct the investment of his or her
individual account to one or more investment choices provided by the
Board of Trustees of the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma.
B. The Board shall provide a standard investment menu of
investment choices for participants, including:
1. A set of predetermined investment portfolio options designed
to reflect different risk profiles that automatically reallocate and
rebalance contributions as a participant ages and constructed to
help create high probabilities of achieving the retirement income
objectives of the plan. The standard options provided for in this
subsection shall be the default investments for individual accounts
unless the participant chooses alternative investments under the
plan. The standard investment portfolios shall be constructed to
adjust the investment allocation on an individual basis over an
Req. No. 14108 Page 13

RBH No. 14108
indi vidual's career with the intent to accumulate assets at
retirement sufficient, in combination with federal Social Security
benefits, to provide the retirement income objectives of each
participant. The standard investment portfolios shall be
constructed to allow participants to include other assets and
retirement plan benefits outside of the plan in determining their
investments under the plan. While the level of retirement income may
be targeted, it is in no way an obligation of the plan, the
employer, the Board, or the state, nor is there any expressed or
implied guarantee of a certain outcome; and
2. A set of diversified investment options allowing the
participant to construct an alternative investment portfolio.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-308 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A participant may receive distribution of vested benefits
from his or her individual account in the plan after:
1. Attainment of age sixty-five (65), or
2. Separation of all eligible employment under this act.
B. The standard form of distribution shall be a lifetime
annuity made available by the Board of Trustees of the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma based on the value of the individual
account of a participant. The standard lifetime annuity shall be
paid as a fifty-percent joint and survivor annuity if the
Req. No. 14108 Page 14

RBH No. 14108
part icipant has a spouse unless the spouse waives this distribution
form in a manner established by the Board.
C. A participant may elect one or a combination of the
following alternative distribution forms:
1. A lifetime annuity based on a portion of his or her
individual account;
2. Lump-sum amount;
3. Periodic distributions, as authorized by the Board; and
4. Deferred distributions until otherwise required by federal
law.
D. If the participant dies before receiving the entire value of
the individual account, it shall be paid to the surviving spouse or
an alternative beneficiary designated by the participant or under
applicable law in a form allowed under this section.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-309 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Notwithstanding any other provision governing the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma to the contrary, each participating
employer shall remit to the System the difference between the amount
of money which would be remitted to the System using the employer
contribution rate required by Section 17-108.1 of this title and the
amount of money required for the participating employer to make the
required matching contribution amount on behalf of a participating
Req. No. 14108 Page 15

RBH No. 14108
empl oyee who participates in the defined contribution system
authorized pursuant to the provisions of Section 5 of this act.
B. The System shall deposit the monies remitted to it by
employers having participating employees in the defined contribution
system created by this act, as described by subsection A of this
section, into the existing defined benefit pension plan authorized
pursuant to Section 17-101 et seq. of this title in order to reduce
the liabilities of the defined benefit pension plan.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-310 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The plan may be amended or terminated by appropriate legislation
at any time without obtaining the approval or consent of any
employer which has adopted this plan and trust, provided that no
amendment shall authorize or permit any part of the corpus or income
of the plan to be used for or diverted to purposes other than for
the exclusive benefit of participants and their beneficiaries. No
amendment to the plan shall be effective to the extent that it has
the effect of decreasing a participant's accrued benefit.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 289, O.S.L.
2023, as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 480, O.S.L. 2025 (70
O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 18-114.15), is amended to read as follows:
Section 18-114.15. A. Beginning Except as otherwise provided
in subsection B of this section, beginning with the 2025-2026 school
Req. No. 14108 Page 16

RBH No. 14108
year , certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of this
title, in the public schools of this state shall receive in salary
and/or fringe benefits not less than the amounts specified in the
following schedule:
MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE
National
Years of Bachelor's Board Master's Doctor's
Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree
0 $39,601 $40,759 $40,991 $42,381
1 $40,035 $41,193 $41,425 $42,815
2 $40,469 $41,628 $41,859 $43,249
3 $40,904 $42,062 $42,294 $43,684
4 $41,338 $42,496 $42,728 $44,118
5 $42,810 $43,968 $44,200 $45,590
6 $43,273 $44,432 $44,663 $46,054
7 $43,737 $44,895 $45,127 $46,517
8 $44,200 $45,358 $45,590 $46,980
9 $44,663 $45,822 $46,054 $47,444
10 $46,684 $47,844 $48,568 $50,945
11 $47,177 $48,336 $49,061 $51,438
12 $47,670 $48,829 $49,554 $51,931
13 $48,162 $49,322 $50,047 $52,424
14 $48,655 $49,815 $50,539 $52,916
15 $50,167 $51,327 $52,052 $54,430
Req. No. 14108 Page 17

RBH No. 14108
16 $50,660 $51,820 $52,545 $54,923
17 $51,153 $52,313 $53,038 $55,416
18 $51,646 $52,806 $53,531 $55,909
19 $52,139 $53,299 $54,024 $56,402
20 $52,652 $53,813 $54,538 $56,917
21 $53,145 $54,306 $55,031 $57,410
22 $53,639 $54,799 $55,524 $57,903
23 $54,132 $55,292 $56,018 $58,397
24 $54,625 $55,785 $56,511 $58,890
25 $56,049 $57,232 $57,971 $60,395
26 $56,542 $57,725 $58,464 $60,888
27 $57,035 $58,218 $58,957 $61,381
28 $57,528 $58,711 $59,450 $61,874
29 $58,021 $59,204 $59,943 $62,367
30 $58,541 $59,724 $60,463 $62,887
31 $59,001 $60,184 $60,923 $63,347
32 $59,494 $60,677 $61,416 $63,840
33 $59,987 $61,170 $61,909 $64,333
34 $60,480 $61,663 $62,402 $64,826
35 $60,973 $62,156 $62,895 $65,319
Master's Degree +
Years of National Board
Experience Certification
0 $42,149
Req. No. 14108 Page 18

RBH No. 14108
1 $42,583
2 $43,018
3 $43,452
4 $43,886
5 $45,358
6 $45,822
7 $46,285
8 $46,749
9 $47,212
10 $49,728
11 $50,221
12 $50,713
13 $51,206
14 $51,699
15 $53,212
16 $53,705
17 $54,198
18 $54,691
19 $55,184
20 $55,698
21 $56,192
22 $56,685
23 $57,178
24 $57,671
Req. No. 14108 Page 19

RBH No. 14108
25 $59,153
26 $59,646
27 $60,139
28 $60,632
29 $61,125
30 $61,645
31 $62,105
32 $62,598
33 $63,091
34 $63,584
35 $64,077
B. Certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of this
title, who do not make a one-time irrevocable written election to
participate in the defined benefit plan, as described in subsection
C of Section 2 of this act, shall receive in salary and/or fringe
benefits not less than the amounts specified in the following
schedule:
MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE
Standard Classroom Teacher Salary
National
Years of Bachelor's Board Master's Doctor's
Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree
0 $45,601 $48,140.61 $49,991.00 $59,989.20
1 $46,100.76 $48,665.44 $50,538.87 $60,646.64
Req. No. 14108 Page 20

RBH No. 14108
2 $46,600.51 $49,189.13 $51,086.73 $61,304.08
3 $47,101.42 $49,716.29 $51,635.86 $61,963.04
4 $47,601.18 $50,241.11 $52,183.73 $62,620.48
5 $49,296.20 $52,021.12 $55,053.84 $66,064.60
6 $49,829.35 $52,579.88 $55,649.26 $66,779.11
7 $50,363.65 $53,142.09 $56,245.96 $67,495.16
8 $50,896.80 $53,701.97 $56,841.38 $68,209.66
9 $51,429.95 $54,261.84 $57,436.80 $68,924.16
10 $53,757.15 $57,258.49 $60,595.83 $72,714.99
11 $54,324.85 $57,855.92 $61,235.74 $73,482.89
12 $54,892.54 $58,452.20 $61,875.65 $74,250.79
13 $55,459.09 $59,047.26 $62,514.27 $75,017.12
14 $56,026.78 $59,642.40 $63,154.18 $75,785.02
15 $57,767.87 $61,472.24 $66,627.66 $79,953.20
16 $58,335.56 $62,068.50 $67,282.43 $80,738.91
17 $58,903.26 $62,664.76 $67,937.19 $81,524.63
18 $59,470.95 $63,261.00 $68,591.95 $82,310.34
19 $60,038.65 $63,857.26 $69,246.71 $83,096.05
20 $60,629.37 $64,477.67 $69,928.04 $83,913.64
21 $61,197.07 $65,073.92 $70,582.80 $84,699.36
22 $61,765.92 $65,671.39 $71,238.89 $85,486.67
23 $62,333.61 $66,268.75 $71,893.65 $86,272.38
24 $62,901.31 $66,864.99 $72,548.41 $87,058.09
25 $64,541.06 $68,601.49 $74,439.65 $89,327.58
Req. No. 14108 Page 21

RBH No. 14108
26 $66,223.56 $70,389.84 $76,380.19 $91,656.23
27 $67,949.92 $72,224.81 $78,371.32 $94,045.58
28 $69,721.28 $74,595.66 $80,414.36 $96,497.23
29 $71,538.82 $76,540.26 $82,510.66 $98,144.32
30 $73,403.73 $78,535.56 $84,661.61 $99,819.52
Master's Degree +
Years of National Board
Experience Certification
0 $51,903.16
1 $52,457.03
2 $53,012.10
3 $53,566.00
4 $54,119.83
5 $57,046.74
6 $57,649.84
7 $58,251.74
8 $58,854.83
9 $59,455.38
10 $62,649.06
11 $63,295.96
12 $63,941.59
13 $64,587.13
14 $65,235.27
15 $68,778.76
Req. No. 14108 Page 22

RBH No. 14108
16 $69,440.60
17 $70,102.42
18 $70,764.24
19 $71,426.04
20 $72,114.66
21 $72,777.73
22 $73,440.88
23 $74,101.33
24 $74,763.09
25 $76,701.83
26 $81,185.45
27 $83,301.84
28 $86,036.32
29 $88,279.17
30 $90,580.50
Agriculture Education Teacher Salary
Years of Bachelor's Master's
Experience Degree Degree
0 $59,621.20 $64,121.20
1 $60,280.09 $64,823.92
2 $60,938.97 $65,526.65
3 $61,599.38 $66,230.99
4 $62,258.27 $66,933.72
5 $64,993.02 $70,615.07
Req. No. 14108 Page 23

RBH No. 14108
6 $65,695.93 $71,378.79
7 $66,400.37 $72,144.16
8 $67,103.28 $72,907.88
9 $67,806.20 $73,671.59
10 $70,874.42 $77,005.23
11 $71,622.88 $77,818.44
12 $72,371.34 $78,631.64
13 $73,118.29 $79,443.19
14 $73,866.75 $80,256.40
15 $76,162.22 $82,750.44
16 $76,910.68 $83,563.64
17 $77,659.14 $84,376.85
18 $78,407.60 $85,190.05
19 $79,156.06 $86,003.25
20 $79,934.89 $88,153.33
21 $80,683.35 $88,978.75
22 $81,433.32 $89,805.83
23 $82,181.78 $90,631.24
24 $82,930.24 $91,456.66
25 $85,092.12 $93,840.81
26 $87,310.36 $96,287.11
27 $89,586.42 $98,797.19
28 $91,921.82 $100,384.73
29 $93,318.10 $101,997.79
Req. No. 14108 Page 24

RBH No. 14108
30 $95,776.85 $103,636.76
C. 1. When determining the minimum salary schedule, "fringe
benefits" shall mean all or part of retirement benefits, excluding
the contributions made pursuant to subsection A of Section 17-108.1
of this title and the flexible benefit allowance pursuant to Section
26-105 of this title from the flexible benefit allowance funds
disbursed by the State Board of Education and the State Board of
Career and Technology Education pursuant to Section 26-104 of this
title.
2. If a school district intends to provide retirement benefits
to a teacher such that the teacher's salary would be less than the
amounts set forth in the minimum salary schedule specified in
subsection A of this section, the district shall be required to
provide written notification to the teacher prior to his or her
employment or, if already employed by the district, no later than
thirty (30) days prior to the date the district elects to provide
retirement benefits such that the teacher's salary would be less
than the minimum salary schedule.
C. Any of the degrees referred to in this section shall be from
a college recognized by the State Board of Education. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from out-of-state school districts
that are accredited by the State Board of Education or appropriate
state accrediting agency for the districts. The Board shall accept
teaching experience from out-of-country schools that are accredited
Req. No. 14108 Page 25

RBH No. 14108
or o therwise endorsed by the appropriate national or regional
accrediting or endorsement authority. Out-of-country certification
documentation in a language other than English shall be analyzed by
an educational credential evaluation service in accordance with
industry standards and guidelines and approved by the State
Department of Education. The person seeking to have credit granted
for out-of-country teaching experience shall be responsible for all
costs of the analysis by a credential evaluation service. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from primary and secondary schools
that are operated by the United States Department of Defense or are
affiliated with the United States Department of State.
D. For the purpose of state salary increments and retirement,
no teacher shall be granted credit for more than five (5) years of
active duty in the military service, as defined in Section 17-113 of
this title, or out-of-state or out-of-country teaching experience as
a certified teacher or its equivalent. Nothing in this section
shall prohibit boards of education from crediting more years of
experience on district salary schedules than those allowed for state
purposes.
E. The State Board of Education shall recognize, for purposes
of certification and salary increments, all the years of experience
of a:
1. Certified teacher who teaches in the educational program of
the Department of Corrections, beginning with fiscal year 1981;
Req. No. 14108 Page 26

RBH No. 14108
2. Vocational rehabilitation counselor under the Department of
Human Services if the counselor was employed as a certified teacher
by the State Department of Education when the Division of Vocational
Rehabilitation was transferred from the State Board of Career and
Technology Education or the State Board of Education to the Oklahoma
Public Welfare Commission on July 1, 1968;
3. Vocational rehabilitation counselor which were completed
while employed by the Department of Human Services if such counselor
was certified as a teacher or was eligible for certification as a
teacher in this state;
4. Certified teacher which were completed while employed by the
Child Study Center located at University Hospital, if the teacher
was certified as a teacher in this state; and
5. Certified school psychologist or psychometrist which were
completed while employed as a doctoral intern, psychological
assistant, or psychologist with any agency of this state if the
experience primarily involved work with persons of school- or
preschool-age and if the person was, at the time the experience was
acquired, certified as, or eligible for certification as, a school
psychologist or psychometrist.
F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to teachers
who have entered into postretirement employment with a public school
in this state and are still receiving a monthly retirement benefit.

Req. No. 14108 Page 27

RBH No. 14108
G. Persons employed as classroom instructional employees of
technology center school districts supervised by the State Board of
Career and Technology Education shall receive a salary increase
amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section
for the step level indicated for the person, provided they remain
employed by the same technology center school district, unless the
hours or the duties of the classroom instructional employees are
reduced proportionately.
H. Persons employed as correctional teachers or vocational
instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Section
510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes or persons employed as
teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall receive a salary
increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of
this section for the step level indicated for the person, provided
they remain employed by the same Department of Corrections or Office
of Juvenile Affairs facility, unless the hours or the duties of the
correctional teachers, vocational instructors, or teachers are
reduced proportionately.
I. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services shall receive a salary increase amount equal
to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step
level indicated for the person, provided they remain employed by the
State Department of Rehabilitation Services, unless the hours or the
duties of the teachers are reduced proportionately.
Req. No. 14108 Page 28

RBH No. 14108
SECTION 12. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14108 CMA 01/12/26





















Req. No. 14108 Page 29

THOMAS E. CUMMINS CONSULTING ACTUARY, INC.
2512 E. 71st Street , Suite D ∙ Tulsa, Oklahoma 74136
(918) 492-9658 ∙ (918) 492- 9659
January 12, 2026
Representative Hays
Room 302
Re: RBH No. 14108
RBH No. 14108 would create an optional defined contribution plan for
teachers hired on or after 11/1/2026. Those eligible teachers may
make a one time election to participate in the Teachers Retirement
System or the defined contributions plan.
RBH No. 14108 is a non fiscal bill as defined by OPLAAA.
I am a member of the American Academy of Actuaries and meet the
Qualification Standards of the American Academy of Actuaries to
render the actuarial opinion herein.
Thomas E. Cummins
Thomas E. Cummins, MAAA